Arkansas, session 2025, HB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 27, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-2709. Independent assessments for home- and community-based
services.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall implement an abbreviated
independent assessment process for beneficiaries who have been previously
approved for services through an independent assessment, including without
limitation a desk review, for beneficiaries who have chronic, long-term
conditions and receive services through enrollment in a risk-based provider
organization.
(b) The department shall apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state
plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to implement this section.
*JMB123*
02-18-2025 10:06:12 JMB123

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H2/18/25 HB1171

/s/K.Moore


































02-18-2025 10:06:12 JMB123